Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2031.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245.50, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Exceptions. A contract may not be entered into under this section for services to persons who: (1) are serving a sentence after conviction of a criminal offense; (2) deleted text begin are on probation or parole;deleted text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end are the subject of a presentence investigation; or deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end have been committed involuntarily in Minnesota under chapter 253B for treatment of mental illness or chemical dependency, except as provided under subdivision 5. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245.50, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Contract notice. new text end new text begin A Minnesota mental health, chemical health, or detoxification agency or facility entering into a contract with a bordering state under this section must, within 30 days of the contract's effective date, provide the commissioner of human services with a copy of the contract. If the contract is amended, the agency or facility must provide the commissioner with a copy of each amendment within 30 days of the amendment's effective date. new text end